Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [471.9994] LANDLORD-TENANT GUIDE. new text end new text begin If a home rule charter city, statutory city, or town issues or renews a rental license, or registration or certificate of occupancy, or a similar document for purposes of allowing a dwelling unit to be occupied by a residential tenant, as defined in section 504B.001, subdivision 12, the city or town must provide the landlord, as defined in section 504B.001, subdivision 7, with a physical copy of the attorney general's landlord-tenant guide, as defined in section 504B.275, or, if the document is renewed or issued electronically, a link to the guide on the attorney general's website. new text end